Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202531-509
Ditches constructed from cities of 100,000 to 300,000 population; improvement beyond the district; publication of notices; election; vote required; effect of negative vote; special assessment.

When the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment files a report and estimate, the county clerk of such county shall publish a notice once each week for three weeks in a newspaper published in the county seat of each of the counties having land within the sanitary drainage district, which notice shall state the filing of the report and estimate, the boundaries of the district to be benefited, that an election will be held at the office of the county clerk between the hours of 8 a.m. and 6 p.m. on a day named in the notice, and that at the election the question of the formation of a sanitary drainage district to include the area described in the report will be determined. The election shall be held in accordance with sections 31-406 to 31-408, except that no directors shall be elected. If a majority vote for the creation of a district based on acreage represented, the sanitary drainage district shall have jurisdiction to make the improvements recommended by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment and to levy a special assessment on the lands specially benefited. If a majority vote against the creation of a district, the work shall not be done.

Laws 1927, c. 144, § 1, p. 390;

C.S.1929, § 31-607;

R.S.1943, § 31-509;

Laws 1961, c. 138, § 5, p. 399;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 72;

Laws 2015, LB361, § 51;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 52.

Under former law, that part of statute precluding recovery of claim for damages is unconstitutional. Cooper v. Sanitary Dist. No. 1, 146 Neb. 412, 19 N.W.2d 619 (1945).